Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB959.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 346 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 346. Refund or Credit of Overpayment.--(a) In the case of any payment of tax not due under this article, the department may credit the amount of such overpayment against any liability in respect of the tax imposed by this article on the part of the person who made the overpayment and shall refund any balance to such person.123456789101112131415161718192021222324 [(b) The department is authorized to prescribe regulations providing for the crediting against the estimated tax for any taxable year of the amount determined to be an overpayment of the tax for a preceding taxable year.](c) If the taxpayer has paid as an installment of estimated tax more than the correct amount of such installment, the overpayment shall be credited against the unpaid installments, if any. If the amount paid, whether or not on the basis of installments, exceeds the amount determined to be the correct amount of the tax, the overpayment shall be credited or refunded as provided in subsection (a) [or (b)].Section 2. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 346.1. Interest on Refund or Credit of Overpayments.--Any tax paid by a taxpayer under this article determined to be an overpayment shall be awarded interest in accordance with Article XXX.Section 3003.26. Interest on Taxes Due the Commonwealth.--(a) All taxes due the Commonwealth shall bear simple interest from the date the taxes become due and payable until paid. The interest rate per annum during each calendar year shall be the interest rate established by the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (68A Stat. 3) , effective January 1 of that calendar year without regard to any change or changes in the Federal interest rate during that calendar year. Penalties shall not bear any interest.(b) The payment of interest under this section shall not relieve a person from the penalties, commissions or additional tax prescribed by law for neglect or refusal to furnish timely returns or reports to the Department of Revenue or to pay a 20250HB0959PN1033 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 claim due the Commonwealth from the person.(c) The Secretary of Revenue shall transmit notice of the rate of interest for each calendar year to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(d) (1) In the case of a tentative tax, estimated tax or installment payment, interest shall run on any unpaid amount from the last day the payment is due to the date paid.(2) In the case of tax which is resettled as a result of a final change or correction of taxable income by the Commissioner of the Internal Revenue Service or an agency or court of the United States, interest shall be computed on any additional tax due from thirty days after the corporation receives notice of the final change or correction until paid.(e) Whenever the tax liability of a person is so affected by any payment or credit, settlement or resettlement, assessment or reassessment or determination or redetermination as to change the interest liability of the person, the interest liability shall be recomputed and adjusted by the Department of Revenue and approved by the Department of the Auditor General in cases in which the latter department is required to approve settlements and resettlements, so as to correspond to the tax liability as changed, without the necessity for the filing of a petition or request by the person or by the Department of Revenue and the Department of the Auditor General.Section 3003.27. Interest on Overpayments.--(a) Simple interest shall be allowed and paid by the Commonwealth upon an overpayment to the Commonwealth of any tax. The interest shall be allowed and paid for the period during which the Commonwealth retained the overpayment, beginning with the date of the 20250HB0959PN1033 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 overpayment, except that:(1) A tax actually deducted and withheld at the source shall be deemed to have been overpaid on the last day prescribed for filing the return or report for the taxable year, determined without regard to any extension of time for filing.(2) An amount overpaid as estimated tax, tentative tax or installment payment for a taxable year shall be deemed to have been overpaid on the last day prescribed for filing the final return or report for the taxable year, determined without regard to any extension of time for filing.(3) An overpayment made before the last day prescribed for payment shall be considered made on the last day.(4) An amount claimed to be overpaid with respect to which an administrative review or appellate procedure is initiated in the manner provided by law by the taxpayer shall be deemed to have been overpaid sixty days following the date of initiation of the review or procedure.(5) (i) If an overpayment of tax is refunded or credited within sixty days after the last date prescribed for filing the final return or report of the tax, determined without regard to any extension of time for filing, or, in case the final return or report is filed after the last day, and is refunded or credited within sixty days after the date the final return or report is filed, no interest shall be allowed on the overpayment.(ii) For the purposes of this paragraph, a final return or report shall be deemed to have been filed only if, when the final return or report is received by the Department of Revenue, the final return or report has been submitted on a permitted form containing:20250HB0959PN1033 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) the taxpayer's name, address and identifying number and the required signature; and(B) sufficient required information, either on the permitted form or attachments to the form, to permit the verification of tax liability shown on the return.(6) A tax paid to an officer, licensee or collector shall be deemed to have been overpaid no earlier than the first date that the tax is required by law to be reported and transmitted to the Department of Revenue by the officer, licensee or collector.(7) Overpayment of interest or penalty shall not bear any interest.(b) Interest on overpayments shall be allowed and paid at the rate as is prescribed for underpayments under section 346.1 less two per cent.(c) Interest on overpayments of the tax imposed under this article shall be allowed and paid at the same rate as is prescribed for overpayments under section 346.1.(d) Interest on overpayments shall be allowed and paid as follows:(1) In the case of a cash refund, from the date of the overpayment to a date preceding the date of the Commonwealth's refund check by not more than thirty days.(2) In the case of a credit for an overpayment, from the date of the overpayment to:(i) the date of the Commonwealth's notice to the taxpayer of the final determination of the credit; or(ii) the date as of which the credit is applied, whichever first occurs, except that in the case of a cash refund of a previously determined credit, interest shall be allowed and paid on the amount of the credit from a date ninety days after the 20250HB0959PN1033 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 filing of a petition for a cash refund to a date preceding the date of the refund check by not more than thirty days whether or not the refund check is accepted by the taxpayer after tender to the taxpayer.(3) The taxpayer's acceptance of the Commonwealth's check shall be without prejudice to any right of the taxpayer to claim any additional overpayment and interest thereon. Tender of a refund check shall be deemed acceptance thereof for the purposes of this section.(e) Interest on overpayment shall not be allowed or paid if a taxpayer indicates an intent to carry forward a refund or credit to be applied in a succeeding taxable year.(f) For purposes of this section, the term "overpayment" means a payment of tax which is determined in the manner provided by law not to be legally due.Section 3. Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly finds that the repeals under paragraph (2) are necessary to effectuate this act.(2) Sections 806 and 806.1 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, are repealed.Section 4. A reference in any other act to former section 806 or 806.1 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, shall be deemed to be a reference to section 3003.26 or 3003.27, respectively, of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0959PN1033 - 6 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526